el: Σύστημα συμβόλων ετικέτας φροντίδας: ASTM (Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες); Αδειοδοτημένα σύμβολα GINETEX; ISO 3758 (διεθνή σύμβολα φροντίδας); Σύμβολα + κείμενο; Μόνο κείμενο (χωρίς σύμβολα); Άλλο
sl-SI: Sistem simbolov etikete za nego: ASTM (Združene države); Licenčni simboli GINETEX; ISO 3758 (mednarodni simboli za vzdrževanje); Simboli + besedilo; Samo besedilo (brez simbolov); Drugo
zh-TW: 保養標籤符號系統: ASTM (美國); GINETEX 授權符號; ISO 3758 (國際洗滌符號); 符號 + 文字; 僅有文字 (無符號); 其他
vi: Hệ thống ký hiệu nhãn chăm sóc: ASTM (Hoa Kỳ); Ký hiệu được cấp phép GINETEX; ISO 3758 (Ký hiệu bảo quản quốc tế); Ký hiệu + văn bản; Chỉ văn bản (không có ký hiệu); Khác
lt-LT: Priežiūros etiketės simbolių sistema: ASTM (Jungtinės Valstijos); GINETEX licencijuoti simboliai; ISO 3758 (tarptautiniai priežiūros simboliai); Simboliai + tekstas; Tik tekstas (be simbolių); Kita
sv: Etikettens symbolsystem: ASTM (USA); GINETEX-licensierade symboler; ISO 3758 (internationella tvättsymboler); Symboler + text; Endast text (inga symboler); Annat
pl: System symboli etykiet pielęgnacyjnych: ASTM (Stany Zjednoczone); Symbole licencjonowane GINETEX; ISO 3758 (międzynarodowe symbole pielęgnacji); Symbole + tekst; Tylko tekst (brak symboli); Inne
ja: ケアLabelシステム: ASTM (米国); GINETEXライセンス記号; ISO 3758 (国際ケアラベル記号); 記号 + テキスト; テキストのみ (記号なし); その他
cs: Systém symbolů na štítku s pokyny k údržbě: ASTM (Spojené státy); Licencované symboly GINETEX; ISO 3758 (mezinárodní symboly údržby); Symboly + text; Pouze text (bez symbolů); Jiné
ro-RO: Sistemul de simboluri pentru eticheta de îngrijire: ASTM (Statele Unite); Simboluri licențiate GINETEX; ISO 3758 (simboluri internaționale de îngrijire); Simboluri și text; Doar text (fără simboluri); Altele
pt-BR: Sistema de símbolos da etiqueta de cuidados com o produto: ASTM (Estados Unidos); Símbolos licenciados da GINETEX; ISO 3758 (símbolos internacionais de cuidado); Símbolos + texto; Apenas texto (sem símbolos); Outro
tr: Bakım etiketi sembol sistemi: ASTM (Amerika Birleşik Devletleri); GINETEX lisanslı sembolleri; ISO 3758 (uluslararası bakım sembolleri); Semboller + metin; Yalnızca metin (sembol yok); Diğer
th: ระบบสัญลักษณ์ฉลากการดูแลรักษา: ASTM (สหรัฐอเมริกา); สัญลักษณ์ลิขสิทธิ์ GINETEX; ISO 3758 (สัญลักษณ์การดูแลรักษาสากล); สัญลักษณ์ + ข้อความ; ข้อความเท่านั้น (ไม่มีสัญลักษณ์); อื่นๆ
da: Symbolsystem til vaskeanvisninger: ASTM (USA); GINETEX-licenserede symboler; ISO 3758 (internationale vaskesymboler); Symboler og tekst; Kun tekst (ingen symboler); Andet
bg-BG: Система от символи за етикета за поддръжка: ASTM (САЩ); Лицензирани символи на GINETEX; ISO 3758 (международни символи за поддръжка); Символи + текст; Само текст (без символи); Друго
en: Care label symbol system: ASTM (United States); GINETEX licensed symbols; ISO 3758 (international care symbols); Symbols + text; Text-only (no symbols); Other
nb: Symbolsystem for etikett: ASTM (USA); GINETEX-lisensierte symboler; ISO 3758 (internasjonale vaskesymboler); Symboler og tekst; Bare tekst (ingen symboler); Annet
sk-SK: Systém symbolov na štítkoch s pokynmi na údržbu: ASTM (USA); Licencované symboly GINETEX; ISO 3758 (medzinárodné symboly údržby); Symboly a text; Iba text (bez symbolov); Iný
hr-HR: Sustav simbola etikete za njegu: ASTM (SAD); GINETEX licencirani simboli; ISO 3758 (međunarodni simboli za održavanje); Simboli + tekst; Samo tekst (bez simbola); Ostalo
zh-CN: 护理标签符号体系: ASTM（美国）; GINETEX 授权符号; ISO 3758（国际洗护符号）; 符号 + 文字; 仅文字（无符号）; 其他
fr: Système de symboles d’entretien: ASTM (États-Unis); Symboles sous licence GINETEX; ISO 3758 (symboles d’entretien internationaux); Symboles + texte; Texte uniquement (sans symboles); Autre
nl: Onderhoudslabel symboolstelsel: ASTM (Verenigde Staten); Gelicentieerde GINETEX-symbolen; ISO 3758 (internationale wassymbolen); Symbolen + tekst; Alleen tekst (geen symbolen); Overige
it: Sistema di simboli Label di cura: ASTM (Stati Uniti); Simboli con licenza GINETEX; ISO 3758 (simboli di manutenzione internazionali); Simboli + testo; Solo testo (nessun simbolo); Altro
hu: Ápolási címke szimbólumrendszere: ASTM (Egyesült Államok); GINETEX licencelt szimbólumok; ISO 3758 (nemzetközi kezelési szimbólumok); Szimbólumok + szöveg; Csak szöveg (szimbólumok nélkül); Egyéb
ru: Система символов на этикетке по уходу: ASTM (США); Лицензированные символы GINETEX; ISO 3758 (международные символы ухода); Символы и текст; Только текст (без символов); Другое
fi: Hoitolappujen symbolijärjestelmä: ASTM (Yhdysvallat); Lisensoidut GINETEX-symbolit; ISO 3758 (kansainväliset hoitosymbolit); Symbolit ja teksti; Vain teksti (ei symboleita); Muu
ko: 케어 레이블 기호 시스템: ASTM(미국); GINETEX 라이선스 기호; ISO 3758(국제 취급 주의 기호); 기호 + 텍스트; 텍스트만(기호 없음); 기타
de: Symbolsystem des Pflegeetiketts: ASTM (USA); GINETEX-lizenzierte Symbole; ISO 3758 (internationale Pflegesymbole); Symbole und Text; Nur Text (keine Symbole); Sonstige
es: Sistema de símbolos de cuidado de la etiqueta: ASTM (Estados Unidos); Símbolos con licencia de GINETEX; ISO 3758 (símbolos de cuidado internacionales); Símbolos y texto; Solo texto (sin símbolos); Otro
pt-PT: Sistema de símbolos da etiqueta de cuidados: ASTM (Estados Unidos); Símbolos licenciados pela GINETEX; ISO 3758 (símbolos de cuidado internacionais); Símbolos e texto; Apenas texto (sem símbolos); Outro